Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202582-318
Public buildings; artwork; terms, defined.

As used in sections 82-317 to 82-329, 85-106 to 85-106.03, and 85-304 to 85-304.03, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Appropriation means the amount of money set by the Legislature in excess of one million five hundred thousand dollars for new construction or in excess of five hundred thousand dollars for remodeling for the particular project which is not limited by law, rule, or regulation less the amount of money spent for planning, land acquisition, and site work;

(2) Art means the conscious use of skill, taste, and creative imagination in the production of aesthetic objects;

(3) Original construction means the erection of a new building or facility and does not include remodeling if the cost is five hundred thousand dollars or less or expansion of existing structures;

(4)(a) Public building means buildings and facilities used by or open to the public as guests or business invitees.

(b) Public building excludes repair shops, garages, warehouses, laboratories, and industrial, agricultural, mechanical, and other buildings of a similar nature; and

(5) Waiver means an exemption approved by the construction project committee pursuant to section 82-321.

Laws 1978, LB 664, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB660, § 32.